District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2502.07

Receivership proceedings; insolvency; impairment.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 59(b), 40 DCR 5773

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 35-1508 to 35-1510.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 7(b) of Insurance Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-76, March 17, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 1626).

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 10-76 and D.C. Law 10-103 purported to amend former § 35-1508 [1981 Ed.] by rewriting (a)(1)(D).

D.C. Law 10-103, § 7(b) ( 41 DCR 1005), eff. April 26, 1994, subsequent to its repeal, amended former § 35-1508(a)(1)(D) [1981 Ed.] to read:

“(D) Is determined, pursuant to the Standards to Identify Insurance Companies Deemed to be in Hazardous Financial Condition Act of 1993, to be in such condition that further transaction of business by the company will be hazardous to its policyholders, creditors, or the general public;”